Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-2147.01
Violations; effect.

If it appears to the
director that any person has committed a violation of sections 44-2126 to
44-2130 which prevents the full understanding of the enterprise risk to the
insurer by affiliates or by the insurance holding company system, the violation
may serve as an independent basis for disapproving dividends or distributions
and for placing the insurer under an order of supervision in accordance with
the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act.

Laws 2012, LB887, § 15.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.